OHIO RECYCLING MARKET DEVELOPMENT BIENNIAL PLAN December 31, 2000 Bob Taft, Governor Published by the Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Sam Speck, Director Michael Canfield, Chief INTERAGENCY WORKGROUP MISSION To proactively strengthen recycling markets by providing and coordinating financial, technical and regulatory assistance programs, conducting research, and implementing procurement and exchange programs for the production and use of recycled materials in Ohio.
STATE AGENCY MEMBERS OHIO DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES To provide quality service, specialized support, and innovative solutions for the effective operation of Ohio government.
OHIO DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENT The Ohio Department of Development serves its customers with excellence and pride to improve the economic climate and the quality of life for all Ohioans.
OHIO DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES To ensure a balance between the wise use and protection of our natural resources for the benefit of all.
OHIO DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION To serve the people of Ohio by planning, building and maintaining a safe, efficient, accessible transportation system that integrates highway, rail, air, public transportation and water networks to foster economic growth and personal travel.
OHIO ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY To protect the environment and public health by ensuring compliance with environmental laws and demonstrating leadership in environmental stewardshi p.
TABLE of CONTENTS INTRODUCTION ..........................................................................................2 MATERIAL SPECIFIC REPORTS ALUMINUM .........................................................................................3 GLASS ..............................................................................................6 PAPER AND OLD NEWSPRINT ............................................................10 PLASTIC ..........................................................................................14 RUBBER ..........................................................................................20 STEEL .............................................................................................22 NON-MATERIAL SPECIFIC PROJECTS ..........................................................25 FINANCIAL RESOURCES ............................................................................30 STRATEGIES .............................................................................................33 PLASTICS TASK FORCE REPORT .......................................................34 TIRE AND RUBBER TASK FORCE REPORT ..........................................41 GLASS TASK FORCE REPORT ............................................................48 CONCLUSION ............................................................................................54 APPENDIX A ­RECYCLING MARKET DEVELOPMENT SUCCESS STORIES ........55 APPENDIX B ­ SCRAP T IRE LOAN/GRANT PROGRAM ....................................57 APPENDIX C ­ TECHNIC AL AND FINANCIAL ASS ISTANCE PROJECTS .............58 APPENDIX D ­ IAWG ME MBERS ..................................................................61
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
1
INTRODUCTION The Interagency Recycling Market Development Workgroup (IAWG) serves as a forum for five major state agencies, the Ohio Departments of Administrative Services, Development, Natural Resources, Transportation and the Ohio Environmental Protection Agency, to support existing and develop new recycling markets.
The mission of this workgroup is specifically identified in the Ohio Revised Code, Sections 1502.1011.
IAWG was created "to provide and coordinate state assistance for the production and use of recycled materials" in the State of Ohio.
The IAWG member agencies have, over the last six years, significantly invested in Ohio's recycling infrastructure allowing for a highly productive and economically run recycling industry.
The funding programs, through the IAWG agencies, conti nue to focus on the industry's need to incorporate advanced technology.
This technology is necessary as markets become ever-increasingly marginal and new products containing multiple materials are introduced into the market place.
Updates on various materi al markets are included in this report.
In an effort to continue successful recycling market development in Ohio, the IAWG representatives met during the summer of 1999 to discuss the potential of forming material specific taskforces consisting of private industry and public/non profit recycling professionals.
After a review of the present status of material markets and receiving input from solid waste districts, local recycling program managers and material recovery facility operators, IAWG decided the markets most in need of potential assistance were glass, plastic, and rubber.
Three taskforce groups, comprised of representatives from both the private and public sectors, were subsequently formed to focus on these materials.
Strategy recommendations were made as a result of each of the task forces and full reports are found in the section, Strategies, starting on page 33 The information provided in this Recycling Market Development Biennial Report 2000 exemplifies the progress of recycling market development in the state of Ohio as the result of current and projected state research, financial, technical and procurement recycling programs.
The IAWG Recycling Market Development Plan allows for a road map that both the public and private sectors can utilize in their efforts to stimulate existing and promote future recycling markets.
2
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
ALUMINUM Current Industry Status Aluminum is one of the few products and industries left in America that truly impacts every community in the country, either through physical plants and facilities, recycling, heavy industry, or consumption of consumer goods.
In terms of both its positive economic and environmental impacts, the aluminum industry remains one of the most significant national and international success stories.
As an economic force, aluminum oxide is one of the most abundant natural resources in the earth's crust.
While aluminum is commonly found in paints, foil, jewelry, and beverage cans, the largest user of aluminum is the transportation industry, particularly in the production of passenger cars.
According to the Ducker Report (1999), the average American passenger car now contains 241 pounds of aluminum.
This has increased from 191 pounds in 1991.
The transportation sector utilized 7.9 billion pounds of alum inum in 1999.
The second largest market for aluminum is containers and packaging utilizing 5.1 billion pounds.
From the environmental perspective, the aluminum industry is also a leader in the preservation of natural resources.
In total, the aluminum industry supply was 24.1 billion pounds in 1999, a record 33% of which was recycled aluminum.
The average aluminum can contains 51.4% recycled material.
And, of the 102 billion aluminum cans produced in 1999, 64 billion were recycled, accounting for 1.9 billio n pounds of aluminum.
Recycling of automotive aluminum scrap is essential to the overall profitability of the shredder and dismantler in the automotive recycling chain.
Almost 90% of automotive aluminum is reclaimed and recycled.
And more than 32% of alumi num used in the transportation sector in 1999 was recycled content.
As a whole, the U.S. aluminum industry operates plants in 35 states, employing 144,000 people, with a total payroll of more than $5.1 billion.
The Ohio Valley is home of the vast majority of primary industry capacity at 33%, or 3,095 million pounds, second only to the Pacific Northwest.
(Data sources: Aluminum: An American Industry in Profile, the Aluminum Association; and the U.S. EPA)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
3
Recycled Grade Aluminum Purchased for Sign Materials The Ohio Department of Transportation (ODOT) annually makes direct purchases of well over 300 tons of aluminum for sign blanks.
In addition, aluminum tubular bridge railing, light poles and arms, traffic control cabinets etc. are also purchased.
Currently, the alloys specified allow the use of recycled materials.
Aluminum is a commodity material that has high value and recycled content is inherent in most products used.
Contact: Ohio Department of Transportation Construction Administration Robert Jessberger Phone: 614/752-5273 Email: rjessber@dot.state.oh.us
NICE3 Program The Ohio Department of Development (ODOD), Office of Energy Efficiency, plays an integral role in economic and community development by administering a variety of energy, environment and economic programs and providing assistance to businesses, non-profit organizations and communities.
ODOD sponsored and submitted a proposal on behalf of Alumitech, Inc., Ohio, to the National Industrial Competitiveness through Energy, Environment, and Economics (NICE3) program.
NICE3 is a U.S. Department of Energy, Office of Industrial Technologies cost-sharing grant program that advances U.S. competitiveness by providing funding for the first commercial demonstration of energy efficient and clean production manufacturing and industrial technologies in industry.
This is accomplished by providing the industrial partner a maximum of $500,000 in federal funding.
Non- federal cost share must be at least 50% of the total cost of the project.
Alumitech, with operations in Cleveland, Macedonia and Streetsboro, Ohio, received a $400,000 grant through NICE3.
The project is titled Closed-Loop Recycling of Aluminum Dross and Salt Cake Landfill Waste.
Through its patented technology, Alumitech has the ability to process aluminum black dross and salt cake to separate and recover the metallic aluminum (4 -10%) and (40-60%) present in the material.
However, a portion of the material, comprised of various non- metallic filtered mineral oxides (NMP), still ha d to go to a landfill.
The conversion of NMP to useful products adds to the economic viability and practicality of recycling operations and closes the loop by completely eliminating landfilling.
To facilitate accomplishing the objectives of the project, the necessary facilities and equipment were designed, constructed and installed to allow production of commercial volumes of finished products with NMP as the major component.
The project's total cost was $3.77 million with an additional capital investment of $1.3 million and included waste reduction of 119 million lb./yr., and the creation of 20 new jobs with more expected.
With industry estimates of over 2 billion pounds of black dross and salt cake being generated by the aluminum recycling industry and landfilled each year in the United States, the need exists for an economically, environmentally sound alternative.
This project involved the commercialization and expansion process to reduce solid waste and, at the same time, conserve energy usage.
It provi ded commercial extension of pilot 4 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
trials that had been based on research results previously sponsored and conducted by Alumitech.
The expansion and conversion of the additional facilities and process equipment will provide Alumitech with what is necessary to accomplish its goal of 100% reclamation of waste to useful products.
It will also provide the aluminum industry with an economically competitive and environmentally superior alternative to landfill.
Contact: Ohio Department of Development Office of E nergy Efficiency John Greenway Phone: 614/466-7406 Email: jgreenway@odod.state.oh.us
Industry Forecast The forecast for the industry overall is positive.
The use of aluminum in vehicles is rapidly increasing due to the heightened interest in lighter , fuel-efficient, vehicles.
Beverage cans, food containers and household/institutional foil are also on the increase.
And, largely due to products in residential, industrial, and highway sectors, the building and construction market has become the third la rgest domestic market for aluminum.
While plastics are taking a niche of the aluminum beverage can market, aluminum will remain strong due to the flourishing transportation, building and construction markets.
In addition, the tremendous cost-savings and environmental benefits of using recycled aluminum will play a strong role in the aluminum industry's future.
History ­ Pricing of Aluminum Cans (Chicago) 1996 ­ 2000 50 40 30 20 10 0 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000
Aluminum Cans - cents per pound
(Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
5
GLASS Current Industry Status The glass industry is one of the oldest industries that this plan addresses.
Glass material continues to be reused and recycled due to its ease and ability to be reduced to its basic elements and converted into the same or an alternative product.
Most recent figures indicate that 75% of all glass produced in America is designated for container products at a rate of 41 billion containers annually.
And of those 41 billion glass containers, most bottles and jars now contain at least 25% recycled gla ss.
The second largest market is fiberglass with more than 500,000 tons of cullet used in 1998 by domestic fiberglass producers.
Many of the facilities now manufacturing insulation are using up to 40% recovered material.
The U.S. recycling rate for g lass, 28%, has remained relatively stable over the last several years.
In Ohio, it is reported that 428,000 tons of glass is recycled annually.
The material is collected through Ohio's established network of curbside programs, drop -off and recycling center locations.
In an effort to reduce programmatic costs, communities are switching to commingled collection strategies, which have resulted in some negative ramifications for glass recycling.
Thus, glass processors have declined sharply over the last decade, with a total of 35 companies in both the U.S. and Canada.
And, of those numbers, Ohio is home to 5 glass processors, operating at 6 locations across the state.
This decline reflects the primary concerns of glass processing, including contamination such as ceramic, and transportation costs.
(Data sources: Resource Recycling, April 2000; The Glass Packaging Institute; Ohio EPA)
Recycling Cooperative Marketing The Ohio Department of Natural Resources (ODNR) introduced the cooperative marketing concept to Ohio's local recycling programs in 1998.
A recycling cooperative consists of a group of individuals, communities or businesses of varying sizes and types, organized around a desire to maximize recycling efforts and improve local and regional solid waste ma nagement systems by creating greater opportunities with economies of scale.
The recycling cooperative organization collectively combines their recyclables for marketing commodities, contract for collection processing, or acquire the equipment necessary to allow them to go directly to market.
Many of Ohio's recycling 6 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
facilities are now participating in cooperative marketing on a regional basis.
These coops consist of public and non-profit material recovery facilities, as well as private facilities.
Recent efforts of the cooperatives have included the solicitation of a glass (cullet) collection/processing request for proposals.
Proposals were received and a private sector processing company was selected to perform the service of collecting, processing, and marketing of cullet.
Presently, a total of six (6) material recovery facilities are actively participating in the program and are finding economic benefits.
The private sector company had collected, processed and marketed approximately 1,630 tons of cullet in the year 2000 for the cooperative group.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Patricia Raynak Phone: 614/265-7065 Email: patricia.raynak@dnr.state.oh.us
Glass Uses in Transportation The Ohio Department of Transportation annually purchases approximately 964 tons of glass beads for use in making retroreflective highly visible, traffic markings.
Currently, contract specifications allow the use of recycled materials.
ODOT purchased over 720 tons of glass beads by construction contract and 244 tons directly.
Crushed glass, as well as other stable recycled materials, are being added to the list materials allowed for roadway embankments.
This new specification for recycled material use i s in a draft form now and is expected to be completed in 2001.
Contact: Ohio Department of Transportation Construction Administration Robert Jessberger Phone: 614/752-5273 Email: rjessber@dot.state.oh.us
Energy Star The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency (U.S. EPA) Energy Star Buildings Program, formally known as Green Lights, is a voluntary effort to increase the energy efficiency in buildings.
The project requires energy audits and renovations in buildings where energy efficiency is cost -effective.
The Ohio Department of Administrative Services (DAS) administers Ohio's program for state government buildings.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
7
Lighting systems are often replaced as part of the program.
While U.S. EPA does not require old lamps to be recycled, Ohio's program does.
As a result, an estimated 167,974 lamps have been recycled as part of the Ohio program.
These recycling figures translate into 42.8 tons of glass, 2.3 tons of metal and 13.5 pounds of mercury.
It is estimated that the program saves state governme nt more than $2 million annually in energy costs.
The more efficient equipment translates into an annual pollution emissions avoidance of 29,900 tons of carbon dioxide, 420 tons of sulfur dioxide and 110 tons of nitrogen oxides.
Contact: Ohio Department of Administrative Services Office of Energy Services Jeffrey Westhoven Phone: 614/466-6776 Email: jeff.westhoven@das.state.oh.us
Industry Forecast The recycling of glass has remained consistent over the last five - year period and is anticipated to remain virtually the same in the near future.
However, the key is quality.
Glass must meet industry specifications in order to produce new, quality container glass.
Glass manufacturers require cullet that is separated by color in order to ensure the quality or color consistency needed for new containers.
New technologies for sorting by color are being researched.
But for now, cullet must be color -sorted by hand.
For suppliers, increased revenue potential often makes it worth the extra effort.
Although mixed cullet has a significantly lower demand and revenue potential, the encouraging news is that the number of products and uses for mixed cullet appears to be expanding.
Products experiencing expansion include fiberglass insulation, roadbed aggregate, blasting abrasive, pipe back-fill and decorative tile.
It is necessary, however, to report that the largest and newest challenge the glass industry faces is the increased use of aluminum and plastic containers.
Thus, some experts have predicted glass container production to slightly decrease.
8
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
History ­ Pricing Flint Glass (Chicago) 1996 ­ 2000 35 30 25 20 15 10 5 0 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000
Flint Glass - dollars per ton (Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
9
PAPER and OLD NEWSPRINT Industry Status This report focuses on three major paper categories: old corrugated containers (OCC), office paper, and old newsprint (ONP).
Although there are several more classifications of paper and paper products, these are the most utilized in the projects that are coordinated by IAWG agencies.
The markets for all three materials have gradually improved over the last 12- month period, with prices for sorted white ledger ranging around $70 per ton and corrugated containers around $65 ton.
Paper industry representatives have predicted that by the end of the year 2000, over 40% of the fiber utilized in paper and paperboard based products will be recycled paper.
That constitutes over 45 million tons of recovered paper in the U.S., with Ohio's portion of recovered paper representing 1.4 million tons.
Another indication of progress is the climbing number of mills producing recycled newsprint.
As recently as 1985, only five paper mills produced recycled newsprint.
Today's figures indicate that over 400 mills in the U.S. use at least some recovered materials in their manufacturing processes, and more than 200 of those mills use recovered fiber exclusively.
In the past ten years, the industry has invested billions of capital assets for using recovered fibers.
The paper industry employs about 1.5 million people nationwide and is committed to recycling.
The number of mills in Ohio is 40, providing 7,579 full -time jobs with an annual payroll of $280 million.
(Data sources: U.S. EPA; the American Forest and Paper Association)
State of Ohio Taxation Booklet The Ohio Department of Taxation consumes large quantities of paper for printing of its tax booklets, brochures and forms.
It has been a goal of the IAWG to encourage Taxation to increase its use of recycled-content paper in the production of these products.
The IAWG is pleased to report that Taxation printed its 1999 State of Ohio Tax Instruction Booklet using newsprint containing 44% post-consumer, recycledcontent paper.
A total of 544,000 pounds of recycled-content newsprint was required, at a cost of $140,800.
10 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Both the Ohio Department of Natural Resources and the Ohio Department of Administrative Services, State Printing, will continue working with the Ohio Department of Taxation to incorporate more recycled-content paper in future printing projects.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Patricia Raynak Phone: 614/265-7065 Email: patricia.raynak@dnr.state.oh.us
State Term Contract for Paper The Ohio Department of Administrative Services (DAS), State Purchasing continues to enhance state term contracts with a variety of recycled-content paper products.
Most manufactured paper products as well as fine papers used for printing, copying and envelope construction are now available in versions containing recycled content.
State Purchasing will continue to increase the variety and recycled content of paper products purchased and the variety of recycled-content products, as the market allows.
This procurement effort not only influences state agencies that use term contracts, but also impacts all local governments that buy through the state's Cooperative Purchasing Program.
In early 1999, the DAS Office of State Printing began using recycled-content copy paper containing 30% post-consumer material as the standard paper for quick copy projects.
The former paper standard was 20% post-consumer content.
Last year, these copy jobs for state agencies amounted to approximately 129 million impressions at a value of over $ 4.4 million.
Contact: Ohio Department of Administrative Services Office of State Purchasing Larry House Phone: 614/466-4764 Email: larry.house@das.state.oh.us
State Copy and Printing Center Paper The Department of Administrative Services, Office of State Printing currently contracts for paper for four copy centers and for large printing term contracts.
The term contracts were last renewed in March of 1999.
At that time, State Printing notified its customers of a new policy that made recycled-content paper the standard for all copies.
Unless
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
11
customers specifically request virgin paper, State Printing will print all orders utilizing recycled-content paper.
One new addition to the contracts is a section for "tree- free" recycled -content writing, text and cover papers.
This new section of the contract offers 100% post-consumer waste wood fiber paper as well as paper made from non- wood fiber.
Non- wood fiber paper is now being made from materials such as old money, seaweed, denim, banana skin, tobacco leaves and the shells of coffee beans.
This new "tree-free" paper became available through State Printing beginning in March 1999.
The cost of "tree- free" paper is somewhat higher than standard recycled paper, but as technology provides more efficient methods and materials for production, the cost of this paper is expected to drop as recycled-content papers have over recent years.
Contact: Ohio Department of Administrative Services General Services Administration, Office of State Printing Joe Tucker Phone: 614/466-8334 Email: joe.tucker@das.state.oh.us
Ohio Newspaper Association In 1992, the Ohio Newspaper Association (ONA) member newspapers reported using about 11% recycled fiber in their newsprint.
Statistics for 1999 reflect newsprint consumption by the 176 Ohio daily and weekly newspapers totaling 356,628 metric tons.
Of that tonnage, 338,417 metric tons contained some amount of recycled fiber, an aggregate recycled-content percentage of 36.3%.
The ONA total exceeded the 1998 goal of 31% as reflected in the voluntary agreement with the state of Ohio.
The final goal in the agreement is 40% for the year 2000 and results are not yet available.
Recently, two major newsprint suppliers to Ohio newspapers, Donohue and Abitibi Consolidated, have merged.
The merger reflects what is happening across the country in the newsprint industry.
Time will tell whether the merger had an impact on the level of recycled newsprint available during 2000 and the opportunity for ONA to reach its 40% goal.
Donohue provided a significant amount of recycled-content fiber to ONA members.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Tom Davis Phone: 614/265-7069 Email: tom.davis@dnr.state.oh.us
Industry Forecast The paper industry is expected to experience a growth period over the next biennium, 2000 ­ 2002, with expansion in the establishment of additional mills that will utilize recycled paper.
Some of the larger paper producers have recently announced they have plans to build and operate a number of arge domestic mills that will utilize recycled l 12 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
post-consumer scrap fiber.
Additionally, some of the older mills that have previously used virgin material will be converted, as the recycled scrap fiber is currently viewed as a less expensive base material.
In addition, continued development of federal and state requirements for purchasing a variety of recycled-content paper products, from printing and writing paper to corrugated containers, as well as state minimum-content newsprint regulations, will help drive industry growth.
History ­ Pricing Corrugated Containers (Chicago) 1996 ­ 2000 40 35 30 25 20 15 10 5 0 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000
Corrugate Containers - dollar per ton (Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
13
PLASTIC Current Industry Status Because the recycled plastics market is a young industry, it ha s been volatile in recent years.
After rapid growth in the early 1990s, the PET and HDPE markets slowed in 1996 due to large increases in virgin capacity but have rebounded since then.
Prices for recovered plastics are closely tied to the price and availability of virgin and off-spec resin.
As a result, prices for recovered and reclaimed plastics have historically been quite low in order to remain competitive.
Major barriers to growth in plastics recycling include the lack of value added markets, consistenc y of quality and quantity, and high transportation costs for plastics collection.
Even with those barriers in mind, the plastic industry continues to demonstrate a wide range of flexibility with new products and uses being introduced.
The American Plastics Council now has registered over 1,300 plastic products with recycled content.
The primary markets for PET plastic are still categorized as fiber for carpet and clothing, and HDPE plastic remains the primary base material for plastic bottle manufacturing, plastic lumber and drainage pipes.
These two grades of plastics account for more than 94% of recycled plastics.
The number of plastics recycling businesses in the U.S. has tripled since 1990 with more than 1,700 companies handling and reclaiming post-consumer plastics.
Ohio is the sight of 13 scrap plastics markets, buying, selling and sourcing a variety of recycled plastics.
Although Ohio recycles more than 120,000 tons of plastics annually, Ohio's scrap plastics processors are demanding more feedstock materials in order to meet their market demands.
(Data sources: American Plastics Council; U.S. EPA; Ohio EPA; Resource Recycling Inc.)
14
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Recycled Plastic Lumber Research Project The Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention continues its participation in the Multi -Client Recycled Plastic Lumber Project.
The project provides a format for researching and developing standards for recycled plastic lumber (RPL).
In addition, general design guidelines, product specifications and a database of information for RPL in structural uses are being addressed.
The Multi -Client partnership presents the research and technology data to the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) for the purpose of establishing ASTM standards for RPL.
Multi-Client Partners U.S. Army Corps - CERL Louisiana State University Plastic Lumber Trade Association Battelle Memorial Lab - Columbus New York Department of Development Rutgers University McLaren Engineering American Plastics Council Ohio Department of Natural Resources Engineering Mechanics Corp of Columbus
These standards, even though approved, must go through a series of "round -robin" testing at three independent laboratories within two years after ASTM approval or the process must start over again.
The Multi -Client Partnership is seeking additional funding in order to accomplish the "round -robin" testing and finalize the existing standards.
The standards will provide a mechanism in which to have architects and engineers acknowledge and use recycled plastic lumber in outdoor decking and marine applications.
They are: D D D D 6111 6108 6109 6112 -97 -97 -97 -97 Density Compression Flexure Creep D 6117-97 Fastener Withdrawal D 6341-97 Thermal Expansion D 6435-99 Shear
The Multi -Client project has expanded its efforts by implementing a number of demonstration projects.
These demonstration projects will test the structural viability, durability and economics of using RPL in decking, boardwalk and marine applications.
Ohio was the location of one of the projects with the construction of a boardwalk located at North Pond on Kelleys Island.
This area experiences wet and damp conditions, extreme temperature changes from summertime 90 degrees F plus to winter's subzero, as well as hea vy snowfalls and ice heaves.
The boardwalk, which is made with recycled plastic lumber, measures more than one - mile in length and is expected to support more than 2,000 people per day in peak season.
The mile - long structure represents more than one million recycled plastic milk jugs.
In October 1999, a ribbon cutting ceremony was held.
The American Plastics Council, the National Audubon Society, and members of the Multi -Client Partnership attended as the Ohio Department of Natural Resources Director Sam Speck led the ceremony.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
15
Another Multi -Client pilot project location was in New York at Lake Placid.
Recycled plastic lumber replaced wood on the staging platforms for bobsled, luge and skeleton racers used in the 2000 Winter Goodwill Games, held in February.
Three staging areas were constructed with the largest measuring 76 feet by 68 feet.
The platform is made from about 1 million recycled milk jugs and laundry detergent bottles and reinforced with fiberglass.
The New York Department of Development, a Multi -Client Partner, led the charge on this innovative project.
The Multi -Client Partnership continues its endeavors of establishing additional ASTM standards and developing guidelines for structural applications.
There are ten more draft standards in ASTM com mittee being addressed and scrutinized for approval: X-20-18 Outdoor Residential Decking Boards X-20-28 Guide - Testing of Plastic Lumber X-20-30 Guide - Plastic Decking Construction X-20-31 Specification for Plastic Lumber X-20-41 Flexural Properties of Marine Piles X-20-43 Plastic Lumber Joists Specification X-20-44 Engineered PVC Decking Boards X-20-48 Radial Compression of Fender Piles X-20-49 Plastic Lumber for Bulkhead Systems X-20-51 Plastic Marine Fendering Systems
Efforts have been made to promote the project, raise additional funds, and develop additional standards by utilizing the media as well as taking advantage of conference opportunities.
In 1999, the ODNR made several RPL Project presentations, two significant ones were at the National Recycling Coalition Congress and the Mid-America Council of Recycling Officials Biannual Meeting.
Another speaking engagement took place in June of 2000 in Toronto, Canada at the R'2000 World Congress on Integrated Resources Management and Envirotech Canada Trade Show.
The Ohio Department of Natural Resources continues to use and test recycled plastic lumber.
Another pilot project that has taken place is at the Ohio Exposition Center in Columbus in the natural resources area.
The Ohio State Fairgrounds festivalstyle seating Amphitheater was reconstructed using RPL.
The Plastic Lumber Company (Akron) supplied 12,000 board feet of RPL in three colors for the project.
The RPL material is 100% HDPE (high density polyethylene) plastic.
ODNR Divi sion of Civilian Conservation Corpsmen from all over the state provided the labor.
Specifications and design were prepared by the ODNR, Division of Engineering.
16
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
The project was completed by June 30, in time to allow 2000's Ohio State Fair visitors to enjoy seating made with recycled plastic lumber.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Donna Stusek Phone: 614/265-6364 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us
New Direct-Contact Food Packaging Resin Over two years ago, Plastic Technologies, Inc. and Phoenix Technologies, L.P. embarked on a $1.5 MM project to develop a unique, proprietary and low-cost approach to decontaminating post-consumer recycled PET (RPET) to produce food-grade quality material.
The two companies also wanted to investigate the commercial feasibility of such a process, now called the "Phoenix Process.
The Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention's Market Development Grant, given to the Lucas County Solid Waste Management District for use by Phoenix Technologies, L.P., in 1997, helped with the development of the purification process and the installation of a pilot production line.
The new process has proven to be capable of purifying even 100% contaminated PET bottles.
Two of the patents covering several proprietary aspects of this process have already been issued.
The ANZFA (Australia/New Zealand Food Authority) has approved the Phoenix Process for food contact application.
Coca-Cola Amatil has built a 26 MM lb./yr. facility near Sydney, Australia, and has been producing material using the Phoenix Process to decontaminate RPET for use in their bottle manufacturing for over a year.
In August 1999, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration provided a "Letter of No Objection" (LNO) to Phoenix Technologies.
The issuance of a LNO for this method is significant in the industry, as it sets a new precedent for the use, not only of deposit grade recycled PET, but also of curbside recycled PET for direct blend in food contact packaging applications.
The success of the earlier development has propelled the organizations into the next phase: full-scale commercialization of the Phoenix Process.
ODNR awarded a subsequent Market Development Grant for $150,000 to Lucas County SWMD and Phoenix Technologies, L.P. to assist with this further evolution of the project.
It is anticipated that the production scale operation will be capable of producing commercial volumes (8MM+ lbs./yr.) of decontaminated (Phoenix Process) resin for use in bottle manufacturing operations.
The success of this endeavor will ensure the realization of a large-scale operation which will produce food-grade RPET resin for commercial sale, and build the knowledge base required to start up and operate sister operations world -wide.
It will be the first operation of this kind in North America, and the only operation in the world existing as a merchant supply source for FDA recycled materials.
Phoenix Technologies, L.P. is already in the business of m anufacturing and selling (nonfood grade) recycled PET pellets, with an annual capacity of 50,000,000 lb./yr.
With the support and approval of Plastic Technologies, Phoenix Technologies is prepared to 17
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
invest in a commercial production line to produce food grade recycled PET for use in beverage packaging applications, including soft drink containers.
Phoenix Technologies will finance capital equipment for the commercial production line, and Plastic Technologies, Inc. will underwrite the remainder of the investment.
It is also significant to note that a portion of Phoenix's expected recycled PET feedstock will be coming from an Ohio processor who uses local curbside bales.
In addition, a portion of the anticipated product (FDA RPET pellet) may be purchased by a n in-state carbonated soft drink bottle manufacturer, thus "closing the loop" and positioning industries in the state of Ohio as global leaders in PET recycled technology.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Donna Stusek Phone: 614/265-6364 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us
Plastic Redesign Project The Plastic Redesign Project (PRP) is a coalition of government agencies and regional associations whose primary goal is to strengthen the economics of local plastics recycling programs.
Because of a proliferation of new packaging designs with uncertain recycling impacts, the project focuses on promoting voluntary design- for-recycling efforts.
The goal is pursued through three complementary strategies: 1.
2.
Research and disseminate objective information about plastic packaging trends and recycling economics to government, consumer product companies, etc.; Promote voluntary commitments by consumer product companies to design plastics packaging that meets their business needs, reducing recycling collection and processing costs, and maximizing recycled material market values; and Promote voluntary commitments by consumer product companies to incrementally increase the recycled content of their plastics packaging in a manner that increases demand and price for recycled plastic while minimizing market disruptions.
3.
Donna Stusek of the Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention, is currently serving on the PRP Executive Committee.
Executive Committee responsibilities in guiding the project include, but are not limited to, assisting in developing strategies, reviewing and revising draft documents, making recommendations on the development of a website, and participating in a partnership with the Association of Postconsumer Plastic Recyclers (APR) and the National Association for PET Container Resources.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Donna Stusek Phone: 614/265-6364 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us
18
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Industry Forecast The plastic industry is predicted to continue to expand into even more bottling markets that were once dominated by the glass industry as well as into automobile related markets, which in the pas t were exclusive to the steel industry.
This transformation is being generated by three elements taking place in today's manufacturing world.
First, plastic technology is growing at an extremely rapid pace.
The development of new markets have come about in the areas of transforming PET plastic into special coatings for corrugated paper and other fibers for the purpose of waterproofing containers.
Multi layer PET containers are being developed for food containers, providing longer shelf-life for the food product.
Secondly, today's form of plastic provides for a wider range of properties, and therefore, can be utilized for a greater number of products.
HDPE plastic is finding new markets in the areas of recycled-content landscape and garden products includi ng items such as lawn chairs and garden edging, and plastic lumber in decking and marine applications.
Lastly, plastic, including recycled-content plastic, is accepted as a long lasting, high quality material, both from companies that serve as producers and suppliers and with consumers of those products and supplies.
Continued development of ASTM standards and life cycle cost analysis will lead the way to a continued growth market for recycled plastics.
History ­ Pricing PET (Chicago) 1996 ­2000 30 25 20 15 10 5 0 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000
PET - cents per pound (Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
19
RUBBER Current Industry Status Annually, more than 270 million scrap tires are discarded in the U.S.
In Ohio, an attempt is being made to reclaim some of those tires.
The Ohio Environmental Protection Agency's most recent annual report indicated that within the state of Ohio a total of 400 tons of rubber were recycled by the residential and commercial sectors.
This recycling effort was exceeded by the industrial sector, which reached the recycling mark of 21,000 tons of rubber.
These figures are anticipated to increase as local recycling programs and solid waste districts sponsor more tire amnesty programs.
The universally agreed-upon technology of how to deal with tires has yet to surface.
The development of American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) specifications has been a key to expanding civil engineering applications such as fill and aggregate as well as other tire markets such as running tracks, playground surfaces, and shoe soles.
In fact, there appears to be more than 110 new products containing recovered tires.
Tire disposal is expensive.
The most recent market figures indicate that the cost of disposing of tires in the Midwest region of the United States ranges from $75 - $85 per ton of tires.
These cost figures indicate the sheer financial dilemma involved in the push to discover the ultimate disposal or recycling methods that will resolve the nation's tire problem.
(Data sources: Scrap Tire Management Council; Ohio EPA; U.S. EPA)
Ground Rubber in Transportation The Ohio Department of Transportation makes direct purchases of ground rubber for use as a crack seal enhancer.
In 1999, a little over 27 tons of ground rubber were purchased for ODOT use, significantly more was used on construction contract job sites.
20
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Recycled rubber is also currently used as the ballast or collar for a multitude of construction barrels and cones.
Contact: Ohio Department of Transportation Construction Administration Robert Jessberger Phone: 614/752-5273 Email: rjessber@dot.state.oh.us
Industry Forecast The Rubber and Tire Industry does not appear to be set for a major improvement beyond its present status.
The costs involved in the proper disposal of the material are not forecasted to increase.
Most industry experts agree that a break-through in technology and the relaxation of government regulations will be necessary for a market shift to occur in this industry.
Cryogenics is the new technology on the horizon.
This process breaks the tire down into its most basic and manageable elements and allows those elements to be rebuilt into another product.
To date, cryogenics has yet to be economically perfected, and therefore, the process remains more theory than fact.
Among the most widely accepted methods for tire disposal is the process of burning the material, or waste -to-energy.
Other alternative uses for the material have come up against the traditional specifying and procurement practices and the natural resistance to change.
History ­ Pricing Tires (Chicago) 1996 ­2000 0 -20 -40 -60 -80 -100 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000
Tires - dollars per ton (Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
21
STEEL Current Industry Status Steel remains the number one material recycled in the United States.
The steel industry recycles and reuses millions of tons of scrap steel from recycled cans, automobiles, appliances, construction materials and other steel products.
The scrap material is simply remelted to produce new steel products.
These remelting processes fall into two categories.
First, the basic oxygen furnace process, which is used to produce the steel necessary for packaging, automobile frames, appliances and steel framing, utilizes a minimum of 25% recycled steel.
The second process is the electric arc furnace process, which is used to prod uce steel shapes such as railroad ties and bridge spans, utilizes 100% recycled steel.
Steel cans, including food, paint and aerosol cans, were recycled at a rate of 57.9% in 1999.
Additionally, 18 billion steel cans were remelted into new products and the amount of steel recovered through recycled packaging exceeded 1.5 million tons.
Appliances were recycled at a rate of 77.3%, totaling a recovery amount of more than 1.9 million tons of steel.
Ohio appears to be the new leader in American steel prod uction.
A recent study by Standard and Poor's DRI ranked Ohio first in terms of the dollar value of steel produced combined with the dollar value of steel value -added processes taking place.
The study found Ohio to have $5.3 billion worth of steel industry activity taking place in 1999.
In addition, Ohio is the location of more than 100 steel companies and employs more than 30,000 people in steel manufacturing and processing.
(Data sources: Steel Recycling Institute; American Iron and Steel Institute; U.S .
EPA; Ohio Steel Council)
22
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
The Ohio Appliance Recycling Round -Up In April 1994, the Steel Recycling Institute, LTV Steel, the Institute of Scrap Recycling Industries and the Ohio Department of Natural Resources teamed up to implement the first Ohio Appliance Recycling Round -Up for the residents of the State of Ohio.
The Ohio Appliance Recycling Round Up was identified as a pilot program to be used as the model for planning future statewide appliance recycling round - up campaigns.
Because this venture was the first of its kind for Ohio, it was decided by all participating parties to limit the scope of the campaign to scrap dealers and local collection programs in Cuyahoga, Medina, Summit, Lorain and Lake counties.
The successful 1995 event collected 8,691 appliances and 475 tons of steel.
In 1996, a financial incentive fund was created by ODNR to help participating communities offset the expenses incurred in the collection of the appliances and also to assist Ohio's solid waste districts to publicize their respective appliance collection and recycling activities.
Thirty counties participated and collected more than 16,000 appliances and 800 tons of steel.
In 1997, two new partners, the Ohio Steel Council and Whirlpool, Inc., joined Ohio's campaign.
The St. Vincent De Paul Society of Cleveland joined the partners group in 1999 and accepts working appliances in northeastern Ohio for their Ohio appliance Recycle for Reuse program.
In the year 2000, 54 counties participated.
The results of the appliance round- up in the spring of 2000 brought the cumulative grand total of 114,476 appliances and 9,803 tons of steel collected.
The Ohio Appliance Recycling Round - Up will continue during the period 2001-2002.
Year 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000 Total # Appliances Collected 8,691 16,000 29,834 16,570 24,067 19,314 114,476 # Tons Steel Collected 475 800 2,908 1,443 2,374 1,803 9,803
Industry Forecast The steel industry is expected to expand above and beyond its curre nt level of recycling and reuse.
The production of automobiles is anticipated to rise with the continued growth of the national economy.
Steel-framed homes are projected to increase so that nearly 25% of homes constructed in the United States will be framed in steel.
The collection system for this material is well integrated throughout the nation and is 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
23
expected to more than adequately support the needed raw material for the steel end use markets.
However, the scrap industry does compete with foreign markets that have an effect upon domestic pricing.
The future of recycled steel is a given.
Steel does not rely on recycled-content purchasing to incorporate or drive scrap use.
It already happens because of the economics.
Recycled content for steel is a functi on of the steelmaking process itself.
History ­ Pricing Steel (Chicago) 1999 -2000
50 40 30 20 10 0 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000 Steel Cans - dollars per ton
(Data Source: www.WasteNews.com)
24
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
NON -MATERIAL SPECIFIC PROJECTS The National Recycling Coalition The National Recycling Coalition (NRC ) is a non-profit organization representing diverse interests committed to a common goal of maximizing recycling as an integral part of waste and resource management.
Paul Baldridge, Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention, presently serves as president of the National Recycling Coalition, which continues to serve as the voice of recycling industries and technologies across the country.
The NRC held its annual congress and exposition in Cincinnati in September 1999.
The Ohio Department of Natural Resources, along with the Association of Ohio Recyclers and Ohio's recycling and solid waste organizations assisted the NRC in making the 1999 Congress a great success.
The Ohio organizations recruited sponsors and volunteers, reviewed abstracts and solicited speakers, helped arrange tours, and assisted with conference location arrangements.
Some of the Ohio highlights at the Congress include:
Programs, Sessions and Speakers Electronics and Appliance Recovery Session - Arley Owens Innovative Uses of Recycled Materials, Plastic Lumber - Donna Stusek Options for Implementing Pay-As- You- Throw Programs - Donna Stusek Reaching the Next Generation: Youth Recycling - Kelly Armfelt Recycling at Colleges and Unive rsities - Larry Cooper Source Reduction/Reuse Workshop - Patricia Raynak Recycling Investment Forum and Press Conference - Donna Stusek, MACRO project manager
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
25
Awards and Recognitions Award of Excellence presented to the ODNR, Division of Rec ycling and Litter Prevention by the NRC's Minority Recycling Council NRC Outstanding Rural Recycler Award for 1999 - Village of Forrest, Hardin County NRC Innovative Recycler Award for 2000 - Phoenix Technologies Inc., Bowling Green, Ohio
On-Site Recycling Program A partnership of the Association of Ohio Recyclers, Rumpke Recycling, Cincinnati FreeStore/FoodBank and ODNR provided recycling and edible food recovery/reuse services to the 1999 NRC Congress attendees The recycling program collection results: 6,822 pounds of paper 2,020 pounds of commingled containers 130 pounds of edible food donated to the Cincinnati FreeStore/FoodBank Grand total of recovered materials: 8,972 pounds
Contact:
Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Paul Baldridge Phone: 614/265-6333 Email: paul.baldridge@dnr.state.oh.us
Recycling Investment Forum The Mid-America Council of Recycling Officials (MACRO) is a 14 state non-profit organization that encourages and coordinates regional programs and review policy issues related to recycling, market development and source reduction.
Donna Stusek of ODNR currently chairs the organization.
In addition to Ohio, MACRO is represented by Indiana, Illinois, Minnesota, Wisconsin, Michigan, North Dakota, South Dakota, Nebraska, Iowa, Kentucky, Kansas, Missouri and Pennsylvania.
26 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
MACRO received a grant from the U.S. EPA to sponsor a Recycling Market Development Investment Forum in September 1999 at the National Re cycling Coalition Congress in Cincinnati, Ohio.
This forum provided an opportunity for expanding and start- up recycling businesses seeking capital to present their business plans to an investor audience.
A total of 68 people attended the forum as nine entrepreneurs presented their business plans to investors.
The entrepreneurs were seeking a total of $29 million in investments and capital expansion loans.
Four of the nine were seeking funding in order to specifically expand and locate facilities in Ohio.
Ma terials of focus for these four businesses are tire/rubber, glass and plastics.
The Ohio Department of Natural Resources was the project manager for the forum.
The total costs for the forum came in under budget and MACRO is presently looking at additional recycling market development initiatives to implement in the region utilizing the balance of funds.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Donna Stusek Phone: 614/265-6364 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us
Ohio Buy Recycled Business Alliance In 1995, the Ohio Buy Recycled Business Alliance (OBRBA) was formed in Ohio to promote the purchase of recycledcontent products and materials.
The OBRBA is a non-profit business league with a Board of Directors and is affiliated with the national Buy Recycled Business Alliance, a program of the National Recycling Coalition.
The organization is a source of information and networking opportunities for its members.
More than 170 businesses and organizati ons belong to OBRBA.
OBRBA held their Annual Meeting for the year 2000 at the LTV Steel offices located in Cleveland, followed by a tour of the Brunswick Goodyear Retread Tire Facility.
Members continue to take advantage of the Boise Cascade Office Products recycledcontent products discount program.
Ohio University purchased recycled products totaling $ 34,024 through this program in the last fiscal year.
The Alliance has decided to institute a membership fee program.
In addition, the national organiza tion recently put into place agreements linking the state recycling organizations and the state BRBAs.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Jim Ankrom Phone: 614/265-7061 Email: jim.ankrom@dnr.state.oh.us
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
27
Ohio Materials Exchange (OMEx) The Ohio Materials Exchange, implemented in March 1998, is a statewide computerized, fax-on-demand service that promotes the use of one company's unwanted materials as another's raw material.
It is an information clearinghouse for available byproducts, virgin products and other forms of unwanted materials.
OMEx is a cooperative effort of the Ohio Environmental Protection Agency, Ohio Department of Development, the Ohio Department of Natural Resources, and Waste Alternatives, Inc., who manages and operates OMEx.
The statistics gathered from surveying participating companies reflected some very promising numbers for the first year of OMEX, March through December 1998: 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
Exchanged over 2,576.54 tons of materials 436 listings 84% of surveys returned Distribution mailing list of over 10,000 FaxBack® upgraded, installed and working at new site Documented savings in disposal fees of $15,450 Estimated savings of $73,431 in MSW disposal fees (at $28.50 per ton Ohio average for MSW from Chartwell Publishers) Program cost of 2.9 cents per pound or $57.66 per ton
The statistical summary for 1999, again proved the success of the partnership: 1.
2.
3.
Exchanged a total of 40,906 tons of materials Estimated savings of $1,636,200 in MSW disposal fees (at $28.50 per ton Ohio average for MSW from Chartwell Publishers) Program cost of 0.17 cents per pound ($3.36 per ton)
The material exchange continues to successfully operate, providing the fax-on-demand service and bimonthly printed addendum of listings and deletions.
In addition, a website has been established and updates, new listings and contact information for all nonconfidential listers, and dates the listings are received.
Visit the website at: http://www.epa.state.oh.us /opp/recyc/omex.html.
Contact: Ohio Environmental Protection Agency Office of Pollution Prevention Nancy Moore Phone: 614/644-2928 Email: nancy.moore@epa.state.oh.us
28
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Identification of Contracts with Recycled -Content Products The Ohio Department of Administrative Services, State Purchasing and the Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention worked together to identify all state term contracts containing items with recycled content.
These contracts are identifi ed by the placement of the Recycle, Ohio! logo next to the contract numbers on the State Purchasing Internet index.
As new products are identified and inserted into contracts and as new contracts are issued, the recycling logo will continue to be used.
Contact: Ohio Department of Administrative Services General Services Administration, State Purchasing Mark Hutchison Phone: 614/466-2375 Email: mark.hutchison@das.state.oh.us
State Purchases and Specifications for Recycled Content Products The Department of Transportation, through the use of construction and product specifications utilizes many tons of recycled products each year.
New products on the market such as the ground rubber construction barrel ballasts, plastic lumber, and paper mulches are under constant review.
Product manufacturers are always welcome to submit their products for review and testing.
In the upcoming year, 2001, a new specification that is being developed with the cooperation of the OEPA will allow more materials that would have gone to the landfill to be used as roadway fills.
Contact: Ohio Department of Transportation Construction Administration Robert Jessberger Phone: 614/752-5273 Email: rjessber@dot.state.oh.us
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
29
FINANCIAL RESOURCES The InterAgency Workgroup, under Ohio Revised Code, Section 1502.11, is assigned the responsibility of assessing the need for and recommending specific types of financial assistance to be provided by the state.
The financial assistance includes lowinterest loans, grants, bonds, and rebates and guarantees for projects such as retooling costs for manufacturers and industrial plants to use recycled materials, capitalization business incubators, new product research and development, demonstration projects, and the application and uses of recycled materials.
IAWG also assesses the need for and recommends specific types of other assistance to be provided by the state.
This includes technical and business- related assistance.
The following provides an overview of some of the financial and business resources available to Ohio's industries, manufacturers, solid waste districts and local government entities.
InfoCycle: Resource Guide for Recycling Companies In 1999, the InterAgency Workgroup updated and enhanced its InfoCycle brochure.
This 35-page document was prepared to assist organizations or individuals who plan to start or expand a business involved in collecting, processing or distributing recycled materials or manufacturing and/or selling recycle d-content products.
The document provides a brief description of important business development, planning and financial considerations as well as government listings and other organizations that can provide information and assistance.
Each organization referenced in the InfoCycle is listed with an overview of their programs, services and contact information.
In addition to printing and distributing a number of the documents, it is also available in PDF file format on ODNR's website: http://www.dnr.state.oh.us/odnr/recycling/pages/infocycl.htm Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Donna Stusek Phone: 614/265-6364 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us
Recycling Market Development Grants The Recycli ng Market Development Grant, administered by the Ohio Department of Natural Resources, provides funds to foster cooperative research and development regarding recycling and for cooperative establishment or expansion of private recycling programs or facilities.
The grant funding for eligible local government entities may be used to design and establish cooperative projects with businesses that will strengthen markets for post-consumer recyclables collected in Ohio.
Grants are awarded on an annual basis, run on an eighteen- month cycle, and currently have a ceiling of $150,000.
The grant requires the cooperating business to contribute an equal financial contribution (100% match) to the project as the amount requested in division grant funds.
30 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
A complete listing of successful recycling market development grant projects can be found in Appendix A, page 55.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Tom Davis Phone: 614/265-7069 Email: tom.davis@dnr.state .oh.us
Recycling Market Improvement Grant In 1999, the ODNR provided Recycling Market Improvement Grant funding to preselected counties and solid waste districts/authorities.
The grant funds were used to obtain equipment and make recycling facility site improvements designed to improve the marketability and/or transportation of one or more residential or commercial recyclables.
Grant recipients were required to provide at least 25% matching funds for the opportunity to potentially receive a $50,000 award.
The one -time Recycling Market Improvement Grant allowed grantees to lease or purchase equipment and/or make recycling facility site improvements that are designed to ultimately improve the marketability and/or transportation of one or more post -consumer recyclables.
Contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention Tom Davis Phone: 614/265-7069 Email: tom.davis@dnr.state.oh.us
Scrap Tire Abatement Project The Scrap Tire Abatement Project, administered by the Ohio Environmental Protection Agency, provides fund and technical assistance to foster the cleanup of scrap tire dumps and identify and sponsor the alternative usage of this material.
The funding for eligible cleanup sites is based upon the size of the site (over 1 million tires), the extent of the public safety and health threat, and location of the site (i.e. near schools, hospitals, residential areas and waterways).
Contact: Ohio Environmental Protection Agency Office of Scrap Tire Management Robert Large Phone: 614/728-5347 Email: bob.large@epa.state.oh.us
Scrap Tire Loan and Grant Fund The Scrap Tire Loan and Grant Fund provides loans for businesses locating and/or expanding in Ohio and can demonstrate that they will create jobs for Ohioans.
The funding for eligible businesses may be used for acquisition of machinery and equipment.
The maximum, direct loan or grant is $250,000 with a minimum level of $50,000.
The maximum participation by the program in any project cannot exceed 30% 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
31
of the total fixed asset costs of the facilities serving as collateral for the state loan.
The interest loan rate for the Scrap Tire financing is currently set at two/thirds of prime and it is a fixed rate.
The loans also carry a .25% annual servicing fee, whic h reduces with the principle.
A complete list of recipients and grant funding levels are listed in Appendix B, page 57.
Contact: Ohio Department of Development Office of Business Development Brad Biggs Phone: 614/644-8201 Email: bbiggs@dod.state.oh.us
Ohio Pollution Prevention Loan Program The OEPA and the ODOD jointly offer a loan program to small and medium-sized companies in the prevention of pollution.
A company must change or re- tool its processes to reduce the amount of waste generated on site.
Funds may be used for part of the costs, acquisition or renovation of machinery and equipment for pollution prevention.
The loan ceiling is $350,000, the interest rate is two -thirds of the prime rate, and the loan amount may be up to 75% of the fixed -asset costs of the project.
Businesses seeking pollution prevention loans apply initially to the OEPA, which reviews the technical merits of the application before sending it to the ODOD, which assesses the financial aspects of the request.
Conta ct: Ohio Environmental Protection Agency Office of Pollution Prevention Mike Kelley Phone: 614/644-3469 Email: mike.kelley@epa.state.oh.us
32
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
STRATEGIES The InterAgency WorkGroup will continue to implement recycling research, financial, technical and procurement programs as referenced throughout this document.
A complete listing of such projects can also be found in Appendix C, page 58.
These initiatives all play an integral role in Ohio's recycling market development plan.
And in an effort to continue successful recycling market development in Ohio, the IAWG representatives met during the summer of 1999 to discuss the potential of forming material specific taskforces consisting of private industry and public/non profit recycling professionals.
After a review of the status of material markets and receiving input from solid waste districts, local program managers and material recovery facility operators, IAWG decided the markets most in need of potential assistance were glass, plastic, and rubber.
Three taskforce groups were subsequently formed to focus on these materials and the membership of these groups was selected.
The groups were comprised of representatives from the private and public sectors, included at least one member from the Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention's Advisory Council, and was facilitated by an IAWG member.
The taskforces met over a period of five months to explore such issues as current and future recycled-content products, recycling market barriers and opportunities, and create recycling market development recommendations for IAWG.
It is the intention of the IAWG to review and analyze the recommendations, which strategies can be implemented based upon available budgets, manpower and missions.
These decisions will be made over the next year and implemented in the future.
Full reports of each Taskforce can be found on the proceeding pages.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
33
Plastics Task Force April 2000
Task Force Members Keith Bailey - Delaware/Knox/Marion/Morrow SWD, Marion OH Jerry Bannister ­ Owens - Ilinois, Inc., Toledo OH Sue Bennett ­ Wyandot County SWD, Upper Sandusky OH Jean Bina ­ Phoenix Technologies, Bowling Green OH Tony Carver ­ Mondo Polymer Technologies, Reno OH Mark Gibson ­ Ohio Soft Drink Association, Columbus OH Jean Gokorsch ­ Magnum Steel 
Facilitator Donna Stusek - Ohio Department of Na tural Resources, DRLP, Columbus OH
Overview Residential/commercial recycling as well as industrial recycling programs have been on the increase since 1990.
Ohio's overall reduction and recycling rate was 26% statewide in 1990 and increased to 39% in 1998.
The industrial sector appears to be taking care of itself with a 51% reduction and recycling rate.
Some of this increased activity can be attributed to better reporting and a more comprehensive accounting of recycling activities.
Waste exchanges are also playing a role in the reduction.
For example, in 1998, the Ohio Material Exchange in its first year of operation, reported 2,600 tons of materials as being exchanged, and in 1999, 41,000 tons of materials.
This reflects a 1,570% increase in materials being exchanged among Ohio industries.
More and more plastics, consisting of a variety of resins, are being used in the residential/commercial sectors.
Durable goods such as appliances, computers, carpeting, transportation products and furniture are among plastic products found in the residential/commercial arena.
Plastic non-durables are also found, like disposable diapers, plastic utensils, trash bags, sporting and recreational equipment, medical devices and other household items.
In addition, plastic resins are also used in a variety of container and packaging products such as polyethylene terephthalate (PET) soft 34 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
drink bottles, high-density polyethylene (HDPE) bottles for milk and water, and a wide variety of other resins such as low-density polyethyle ne (LDPE) and polystyrene (PS) used in other plastic containers, bags, sacks, wraps and lids.
Types of Plastics Reduced/Recycled During 1996 in Ohio Type Plastic PET HDPE Plastic All Other Plastic Total Plastic Residential/Commercial Tons 5,700 6,300 12,200 24,200 Industrial Tons 3,200 3,900 87,600 94,700
Reviewing the types of materials being reduced and recycled, a variety of plastics make up the stream's composition.
While the tonnage is not as great as metal or paper, the volumes are significant.
Increasing "lightweighting" of plastics and packaging taint the true picture of how much plastic actually exists in today's solid waste stream.
Plastics made up an estimated 390,000 tons of the country's MSW generation in 1960 and in 1997 jumped to 21.5 million tons.
While overall recovery of plastics for recycling is relatively small ­ 1.1 million tons, or 5.2% of plastics generation in 1997, recovery of some plastic containers has generally increased.
Plastic PET soft drink bottles were recovered at a rate of 37.3% in 1997.
Recovery of HDPE milk and water bottles was estimated at about 31.3 % in 1997.1
Current Status The current status of recycling plastics in Ohio is most interesting.
Virgin resin prices drive the prices paid for recycled resins.
Due to the increase in oil prices and the fluctuation in the Asian markets, recycled plastics markets are moving and prices for PET and HDPE are on the increase.
But rather than being driven by global markets and economy, we need to look here at home and develop a stronger infrastructure for the recycled plastics industry.
More plastic is replacing glass containers and poses advantages such as safety and resealability.
Ohio plastic lumber manufacturers need more recycled HDPE as plastic lumber and composite lumber are increasing in demand.
More industries are looking at "closed loop" systems in order to use and maintain their inventory of recycled plastic pallets.
Designing for recyclability is a hot issue, also with the Association of Postconsumer Plastic Recyclers' "Champions for Change" program, addressing recyclability by marketers of new packaging is on the increase.
Architect and engineers are looking for performance-based standards and lifecycle cost analyses for recycled-content plastic construction products and materials.
Ohio-based industry needs more recycled PET for pipe as the recycled content makes a
1
The primary source of data on plastics recovery is an annual survey conducted for the American Plastics Council.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
35
better product.
Coca Cola has announced that they will be integrating recycled plastic into their bottle - making process.
But, with the ever-changing technology in plastic packaging, more and more recycling issues are surfacing.
PET bottles are truly one of the fastest -growing markets these days.
Contamination issues arise with many of the newly designed plastic bottles entering the recycling stream.
Issues such as the multi - layer, barrier bottles, new amber and blue colors, and full -body PVC labels on PET bottles are causing contamination concerns among recyclers.
But, as stated earlier, Ohio's processors need more plastic and, at thi s time, are willing to overlook the contamination issues in hopes of greater volumes of secondary plastics.
Processing capacity is there.
Across the U.S.A., there are 24 PET plastic processors with a total processing capacity of 550,000 million tons.
As of 1998, a total of 294,000 tons of PET were collected through curbside programs.
Recycling is a business and to continue to exist, recycling collections, processing, manufacturing and procurement must be considered.
Both material supply and demand must be constantly nurtured.
Generation, Recovery, Processing Capacity for PET (in thousands of tons) Soft Drink Bottles 800 700 600 500 400 300 200 100 0 1980 1990 1998 Processing Capacity Generated Recovered
36
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Task Force Recommendations Recommendation #1 Increase research and development efforts by manufacturers toward designing for recyclability, increase recycled content, and incorporate recycled-content resin into the virgin resin stream where feasible.
Target audience: Manufacturers - Initial packagers, bottlemakers, containers, pipes, molders, etc. including recycledcontent producers A. ODNR is to develop a database of all Ohio plastic manufacturers.
The database will be used for the purpose of future communications, conferences, input, and data collection.
A letter from Governor Taft to the Ohio plastic manufacturers will encourage response for the data and information.
Current lists for ODNR use are available from ODOD, American Plastics Council (APC), the National Association for PET Container Resources (NAPCOR) and the Ohio Plastics Summit listing.
B. ODNR is to continue its parti cipation with the National Plastic Redesign Project (PRP) and report back to IAWG on issues and developments.
The PRP is a network of state and local government recycling officials and private consultants addressing plastic packaging issues such as multi - layer bottles, metallic labels, caps, and new polymers and supporting the work of the Association of Postconsumer Plastic Recyclers (APR).
Efforts are to encourage plastic manufacturers to embrace the concept of designing for recyclability and responsible packaging.
ODNR is to partner with the Ohio Plastics Summit and with plastic's academia for the purpose of sharing information, addressing technology concerns, and promoting recycling and recyclability.
C. ODNR is to identify, acknowledge and recognize manufa cturers successfully using recycled plastics, and more specifically, those companies embracing the design for recyclability guidelines.
This can be done through a number of existing programs such as ODNR - Take Pride Ohio Awards Program, APR - Partners/Cha mpions of Change Award, and the Governor's Pollution Prevention Award.
Develop a publication of "Ohio's Best of the Best", a documentation of some of the best recycled-content product manufacturers in Ohio.
Also, list that information on DRLP's website.
D. IAWG members need to increase the promotion of state financial assistance programs through existing and new programs.
Provide updated financial assistance information to Ohio organizations such as the Ohio Manufacturer's Association, Ohio Municipal League, and the Ohio County Commissioners Association.
The Ohio Department of Development is to provide financial assistance information to the Ohio Small Business Development Centers for distribution to and use by 37
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
recycling businesses and entrepreneurs.
ODOD also needs to include the ODNR in ODOD's planning of Innovest, an investment forum, to make certain that recycling businesses and entrepreneurs are invited and included.
E. ODOD is encouraged to investigate conducting incentive tax/training for entrepreneurs.
It is recommended that ODNR improves its promotion of the Recycling Market Development Grant (RMDG) program in an effort to increase the number of applications.
Also, ODNR is encouraged to investigate the reallocation of grant dollars in order to increase to current pool of RMDG dollars.
Recommendation #2 Develop and distribute a uniform message for local and statewide distribution focusing on recyclability and environmental impacts.
Target audience: Consumers - Public, government sector, private industry A. ODNR is to investigate the possibility of conducting a statewide campaign for #1 and #2 plastics.
APC statistics reflect a 94 ­ 95% success rate in the recovery of #1 and #2's when aggressive campaigns are initiated.
Approach NAPCOR and APC to explore joint campaigns and potential funding assistance.
Inform APC and NAPCOR that this is a recommendation of the IAWG, Plastics Task Force.
Ask NAPCOR if they will work with Ohio to provide an opportunity to piggyback on NAPCOR's on-going campaign.
Develop an Ohio relevant message and distribution plan, i.e. "Anything with a neck" or possibly "If you drink from it, recycle it".
Create a recycling theme with the potential of combining it with an anti -littering campaign to target the 20 oz. soft drink containers from convenient stores as well as the plastic beer bottles from sport venues.
Do not exclude notation of #3 - #7 as also being recyclable.
The Ohio EPA is to investigate the possibility of requiring the collection of #1 and #2 plastics as a minimum requirement in meeting the state recycling goal.
B. Encourage customers to increase pressure on manufacturers to include recycled content when feasible.
Promote "Buy Recycled" products to increase demand.
Government agencies and IAWG agencies, particula rly, should take the lead, utilizing executive orders, bid specifications and contracts.
Also, promote the results of HB 25 State Agency Recycled Content Procurement Annual Reports and conduct recycled-content product research and pilot projects across the state.
C. Continue technical and financial support and partnership of the Ohio Material Exchange (OMEx).
OMEx is a partnership of the Association of Ohio Recyclers, 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
38
and three of the IAWG member agencies - Ohio Dept. of Development, Ohio Environmental Protection Agency and the Ohio Dept. of Natural Resources.
OMEx provides a service to DRLP tier one and two taxpayers.
It is a voluntary program that provides a diversion mechanism for Ohio's industries.
Continue to provide annual updates, working diversion a nd full cost analyses into the report.
Recommendation #3 Direct more funding and support to develop and establish the recycling infrastructure to include PAYT programming and education and awareness.
Target Audience: Recycling collectors, sorters ­ All MRFs A. ODNR is to processing to efficiently use rural areas and marketing for efficient regional promote regional conserve and more funds.
Develop the promote cooperative more effective and processing.
Seek to upgrade and expand existing public and no n-profit MRFs with grant funds through the ODNR.
Inventory MRF's and equipment, assess equipment, funding and transportation needs.
This could lead to improved allocation of funds, better equipment and assist in keeping transportation costs under control.
B. ODNR is to review the Recycle Ohio Grant (ROG) and Recycling Market Improvement Grant (RMIG) limits and ceilings in order to increase volumes, improve cost effectiveness and decrease processing costs.
Increasing volumes need to be linked to diversion opportunities such as PAYT.
ODNR and OEPA need to work together to evolve Solid Waste Management plans and grants in order to compliment each other.
C. Investigate additional funding sources and programs.
Continue efforts to increase the funding leve l for the ODNR, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention.
Create plans to use more funds for recycling market development.
Investigate a recycling revolving loan program for Ohio recycling businesses, linked deposits (State Treasure), incentives progra ms to replace virgin with secondary materials.
D. ODNR is to increase support for business/commercial collection programs.
Create recycling pilot programs for businesses and commercial establishments.
Continue agriculture film project by expanding efforts across the state; promote recycling collections at sport venues, shrink -wrap from wholesalers, warehouses and distribution centers.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
39
Recommendation #4 Summarize the current state of issues for intermediate plastic processors that include the best practi ces, contamination, and emerging technologies.
Target audience - Intermediate Processors - Industry that flakes, grinds, pelletizes, washes, etc.
A. ODNR is to identify, acknowledge and recognize intermediate processors who are successfully using recycle d plastics, and more specifically, those companies embracing the design for recyclability guidelines.
Utilize existing programs such as Take Pride Ohio, APR's partners/Champions of Change Award, and the Governor's Pollution Prevention Award to recognize the best.
Promote best practices through the enhancement of ODNR's website; create and distribute "Best Practices" document for Ohio's businesses; seek out success stories and case studies in Ohio and from other states to use as examples.
B. ODNR is to continue participating in the national Plastic Redesign Project and report back to IAWG.
Disseminate APR/PRP information to the intermediate processors and encourage them to embrace the concept of designing for recyclability and responsible packaging.
It is the ever-changing technologies in packaging and plastic bottles that will affect the value of secondary materials.
Utilize the Ohio Plastics Summit as a mechanism in which to do that.
ODOD and ODNR are to work with packaging, plastics and business schools and other academia.
C. ODNR is to continue to develop its database by targeting all Ohio plastics intermediate processors for information to develop a database for future communications, conferences, input, and data collection.
Create a letter for signature by Governor Taft to send to all Ohio plastics intermediate processors to encourage response for data and information.
Utilize ODOD, APR, APC, NAPCOR, and the Ohio Plastics Summit Listing for contact list.
40
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Tire/Rubber Taskforce April 2000
Task Force Members Tim Berlekamp ­ Mahoning County SWD, Youngstown OH Chet Chaney ­ Ohio Department of Natural Resources, Columbus OH Brian Enck ­ Ohio EPA, Columbus OH Karl Grzeschik ­ Spartan Rubber Company, Barberton OH Mark Loeser ­ American Electric Power Company, Columbus OH Mike Long ­ Solid Waste Authority of Central Ohio, Grove City OH Tom Lyons ­ C 
Facilitator Brad Biggs - Ohio Dept. of Development, Economic Development, Columbus OH
Overview In 1993, the Ohio General Assembly passed Senate Bill 165, Ohio's Scrap Tire Law.
SB 165 became effective in 1994 when the $.50 fee assessed on the wholesale of every tire delivered to retail dealers in Ohio.
These fees, an annual account of approximately $3.5 million, fund activities such as inspections and enforcement of regulations, state - funded removals of existing tire dump sites, and provide loans for the establishment of new tire recycling and recovery facilities administered by the Ohio Department of Development (ODOD).
Also established was a comprehensive framework for regulating scrap tire transportation, collection, storage, processing and disposal in the form of registration (or permitting) and licensing of scrap tire transporters and facilities.
Mainly, this was due to the banning all whole and/or shredded tires from municipal solid waste landfills in 1997.
Ohio EPA reported that, in 1998, more than 11 million scrap tires were generated in Ohio.
Ohio's regulatory program has made steady progress and is a key to successfully managing scrap tires by developing the business "infrast ructure" of collection, transport, storage, and disposal facilities.
Ohio EPA's Scrap Tire Abatement Fund has funded the 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
41
removal of over 7.7 million tires from the first five cleanup sites and a sixth contract has been awarded.
The total dollar value of these six contracts is $8.7 million for the removal of 10.5 million tires.
The fee was statutorily scheduled to sunset on June 30, 2000.
Under H.B. 283, the 2000-2001 Biennial Budget bill, the $.50 fee was extended for an additional six years through June 2006.
Ohio EPA estimates that the number of scrap tires open dumped or stockpiled in Ohio is between 30 and 40 million tires located at approximately 63 scrap tire sites throughout Ohio that will need to be cleaned up with state funding.
This estimate takes into account local enforcement actions and local cleanup funding that has removed and continues to remove hundreds of thousands of scrap tires every year.
A final but important part of Ohio's Scrap Tire Program is the development of new markets, researc h and technologies.
ODOD is provided funding from the Scrap Tire Management Fund, receiving a minimum of $1 million per year to provide loans and grants to scrap tire businesses and local governments for projects using recycled scrap tires.
Hurdles The taskforce was requested to identify the hurdles this material market currently faces.
Although the group focused on issues related to the state governmental system, some items are obviously universally applicable.
The re-occurring theme dealt with the restrictions to level the scrap tire market's "playing field" brought on by the tire law and regulations administered through Ohio Environmental Protection Agency, approved County Health Departments and the Ohio Department of Development.
1.
Lack of clear understanding within the scrap tire processors regarding performance specifications pursuant to the Ohio Revised Code, Section 125.082 (Ohio Department of Administrative Services ­ Specifications required for state purchasing of recycled-content products.)
2.
Government subsidies provided to private sector entities and potentially unfair subsidization.
3.
Stringent regulations related to transport, storage and approval process required for beneficial uses.
4.
State purchasing agents' general reluctance to consider purchase of recycled rubber products.
5.
Technological limitation to more economical conversion of whole tires to marketable products.
6.
State -funded Kirby Tire Pile Abatement project currently usurping all available state funds thus precluding availability for any other state -funded illegal state funded tire pile abatement projects.
42
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Opportunities In contrast to the hurdles, the Workgroup created a listing of potential opportunities for the expansion of the tire market.
This listing was created from the pri vate sector perspective, with the understanding that state government can serve a supporting role: 1.
State purchasing system that allows use of recycled materials by some state agencies; 2.
One stop shopping for information regarding markets (clearinghouse co ncept); and 3.
State government approved engineering standards and specifications for the use of scrap tire materials that they are responsible for implementing.
Accomplishments The group was assigned the additional task of categorizing those efforts that they viewed as positive accomplishments related to this specific market.
These positive efforts dealt with preventative regulation, governmental funding to targeted projects and research efforts.
1.
Pursuit and prosecution of individuals and companies unwilling to cooperate to properly abate environmental threats and public nuisances posed by illegal tire accumulations; 2.
Regulatory efforts to abate environmental threats and public nuisances posed by excessive accumulations of scrap tires by working with the regulated scrap tire community (transporters, storage facilities processing facilities and disposal facilities) requiring the reduction of excessive tire pile accumulations (which took place prior to the new regulations) and by installing proper fire lanes, limiting pile sizes, and by tracking the flow of tires through annual reports to Ohio EPA); 3.
Authorization of individuals and construction companies proposing to use whole or processed scrap tires in some manner through a systematic evaluation process to discern appropriate beneficial use projects; 4.
Ohio Department of Development loans and grants to stimulate sustainable market development; 5.
Increased awareness of scrap tire issues through regulation/enforcement action; and 6.
Perform state and locally funded tire clean- up projects.
Products Prior to focusing on the strategies for assisting the tire/rubber market, we attempted to provide a comprehensive listing of those products that are made of recycled tires and 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
43
rubber worldwide.
The listing is divided between those products comprised of shredded/chipped tires and crumb rubber (all of which are considered to be processed).
Shredded/Chipped/Stamped Tires 1.
Aggregate substitute to enhance drainage away from structures: around building foundations, under new roads, in leachate collection systems in landfills, in a final cap of landfills, in on-site septic system leachfields, or as a bulking agents in large waste composting facilities; 2.
Subgrade foundation insulation layer: around new buildings, in roads; 3.
Alte rnate lightweight backfill material: around building foundations and under new roads where weight/low pressure material is needed; 4.
Wire free mulch: in children's playgrounds, equestrian tracks, livestock mattress bedding, landscape mulch; 5.
Non-wire free i n manufacturing of (automobile) traffic sound barriers; 6.
Fuel substitute (coal, oil, gas, wood) electric co-generation blend as Tire Derived Fuel (TDF) chips; 7.
Truck and boat dock bumpers, culvert pipes, blasting mats, "portable" reusable mats as haul roads and wetland crossings for the logging and mining industries, earth moving tires cut out to make farm tractor shovel scoop blades, molded sound barriers, traffic barrel control rings, bagel cut tire halves as sub -surface water collection reservoirs in new golf course construction, door mats, shoe soles; and 8.
Rifle range backstops, racetrack crash barriers, fuel for cement and lime kilns.
Crumb Rubber 1.
Automotive products, sound insulation, step pads, truck and trailer liners, anti fatigue mats, drip irri gation pipes; 2.
Soil amendment to reduce soil compaction and to enhance soil aeration; and 3.
Rubberized athletic surfaces, roofing surfaces and walkway pads, carpet underlayment, mouse-pad backing, speed bumps, containers, pallets, flooring material, patio floor blocks, rubberized asphalt for new surfaces, used as a filler in new tire manufacturing.
Quality and Consistency 44
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
The issue of quality and consistency was a major concern for the taskforce as this material serves as the base material for such a variety of products.
The members have all agreed that the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) standards should serve as a basis for what should be considered an acceptable level of quality and consistency for civil engineering related construc tion projects.
Short Term Goals The taskforce set forth a listing of short -term goals that the State of Ohio should attempt to accomplish.
These goals are within the operational mission of those agencies noted in the descriptions provided below.
1.
IAWG should implement a recycled content educational program governmental agencies and their representatives.
This program should with an external education programs (i.e. International Tire and Association, Scrap Tire Management Council, etc.) for industry that recycling and reuse information through conferences, seminars; for state coincide Rubber includes
2.
Conduct annual educational workshop for state procurement officers to promote the purchase of recycled rubber/tire content products; and 3.
Change the regulato ry funding process to a $2 retail fee per tire to support incentive programs and provide additional funding not now available for state and local clean- up projects other that just the current clean- up project (i.e. the Kirby Tire Pile).
A portion of the additional funding would be directed to fund clean- up efforts not currently possible due to some of the budget limitations realized by several local solid waste management districts.
Incentive Recommendation: In order to encourage the development of recycling uses for scrap tires involved in state purchases, the State of Ohio should allow an increase in price for those contracts, goods, and services, or portions of contracts, goods, and services that utilize scrap tires.
A contract, good, or service purchased by the State of Ohio should be allowed a price increase of up to 15% for that contract, good, or service.
The price increase would be based on a formula that reflects the percentage of the good, contract, or service directly attributable to the blended use of scrap tire.
The percentage of each product comprised of scrap tire would be multiplied by the maximum increase of 15% and so result in an allowable price increase for each good, contract, or service.
Support the reduction of regulations for those projects that involve tire chips in landfill liners and other civil engineering projects.
Construction Related Recommendation: Establish a 1.5% price increase allowance for the coating of pavement which contains 10% scrap tire crumb rubber.
If scrap tire shreds (chips) are used in the base construction of a highway, the amount of shredded tires used to replace conventional aggregates should be given a direct 15%
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
45
price increase.
Labor, material, excavation, and construction costs which increase due to the us e of shredded scrap tires shall be cost pro-rated.
The use of scrap tire material as backfill in slopes, sub -base, and as drainage substrate shall be treated in the same manner as above.
Service Related Recommendations : Energy and power contracts with the deregulated energy industry should be designed to permit the contractor to recover energy costs associated with use of scrap tires as a fuel source by the following method: If an electric utility uses a mixture of 80% coal and 20% scrap tires, the cost of contracts may be calculated by the following method: 20% (scrap tire content) times (X) 15% maximum price allowance equals (=) 3% overall price increase adjustment.
Goods Related Recommendations : Goods should be given the price allowance by the followi ng methods: If a purchased good is manufactured from 100% recycled scrap tires the allowance should be the maximum or 15% above the cost of a competitive good with no recycled scrap tire content or a lesser amount of scrap tire content.
Long Term Goals The group reviewed the market and industry's current status and potential growth over the next five and ten year periods.
It is apparent that market growth depends greatly upon the advancement of the industry's technology and the government's willingness to explore the availability of recycled-content products.
As with all products, the consistent availability of high quality products manufactured with recycled rubber has a strong impact on the market development through addressing customer expectations that good quality products will be available when needed.
Hence, the taskforce group felt it was imperative to establish a set of long -term goals and thereby begin to provide a strategic planning process by which the market success could be measured.
1.
Provide for more effective research and more effective exchange of information, through an inter- network list serve, and/or consortium; 2.
ODOD's funding should be directed toward more research/technology and sustainable market development; 3.
Administer an assessment of the political, economic and regulatory barriers to the incineration of tires; 4.
State government should review and provide direction to the markets through procurement of materials by way of setting specifications for recycled-content products (ORC 1 25.082); 5.
The state should attempt to recover 100% of the cost per tire for the state - funded clean- up of all illegal tire dump sites;
46
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
6.
State agencies should encourage the beneficial use for tires where appropriate (i.e. as an aggregate substitute in leachate collection systems in landfills, backfill for new buildings as drainage material and foundation insulation, septic system aggregate); 7.
The Inter -agency Work Group should communicate and educate Ohio's Business Community on the proper applications of approved beneficial uses scrap tire based materials; and 8.
Encourage Ohio EPA to continually improve the enforcement mechanisms for cradle to grave accountability of tires that are sold and disposed of in Ohio.
The group wanted to ensure that the level of success was measured, therefore, they laid out what the taskforce considered reasonable and quantifiable measurement tools.
As referred to earlier in this report, the success of strategic planning and market development is dependent upon the ability to esta blish and utilize appropriate measurement systems.
The measurement tools provided below are intended to quantify the effect of the long -term and short- term goals on the present status of the tire/rubber market: 1.
Within a 3 year period, all IAWG state agencies would utilize 15% recycledcontent rubber and/or tire material in their specifications for available products; 2.
The establishment of a communication system to allow for consistent feedback between private sector businesses and state procurement officers; and 3.
Goods containing less than 100% recycled scrap tire content should be given a price allowance following the following calculation: 50% scrap tire contents times (X) 15% maximum price allowance equals (=) 7.5% overall price increase adjus tment.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
47
GLASS April 2000
Task Force Members Diane Bickett - Cuyahoga County SWMD, Cleveland OH Steve Bunke - Theco, LLC., Jackson Center OH Dave Dlubak - Dlubak Glass Company, Upper Sandusky OH Pete Handwork - Strategic Materials, Grosse Point MI Patrice Hauser - Owens - Illinois, Toledo OH Bill Lutz - Ohio EPA, DSIWM, Columbus OH Bob Prior - Anchor Glass Container, Tampa FL Patricia Raynak - ODNR, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention, Columbus OH Jeff Sarber - Waste Management Inc., Canal Winchester OH Tom Slark - Rumpke Recycling, Columbus OH Donna Stusek - ODNR, Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention, Columbus OH Kathy Trent - Waste Management, Inc., Cincinnati OH Dan Wickerham - Adams Brown Recycling, Georgetown OH Lance Wilson - Gallia/Jackson/Meigs/Vinton SWMD, Wellston OH
Facilitator Andrew Booker - Ohio EPA, Division of Solid and Infectious Waste, Columbus OH
Overview Two different types of glass are relevant to a discussion of glass recycling: container glass and plate glass.
Conta iner glass, as the name implies, is glass produced in the form of containers, generally for food and drink products.
The U.S. EPA estimates that container glass accounts for about 88% of all glass generated in municipal solid waste.
Plate glass is all glass produced in a flat form, the majority of which is used for automobile and building windows.
The U.S. EPA does not provide an estimate for the generation or disposal of plate glass.
The Glass Task Force recognized that both container and plate glass markets were potential problems in Ohio, but chose to focus their efforts primarily on issues related to container glass recycling.
To a large degree, the container-glass focus was due the Task Force's desire to focus on residential recycling issues.
Througho ut the remainder of this document, references to glass collection, recycling, and markets will refer to container glass unless specified otherwise.
In theory, glass can be recycled an infinite number of times.
Glass bottles and jars have been used and recycled by humans for thousands of years.
Glass can be recycled into a wide variety of products, including glass containers, fiberglass, beads, and decorative tiles, and reused as an aggregate substitute in road construction and as an abrasive in sand -blasting.
48 2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Nationwide, most glass that is recovered from municipal solid waste is recycled back into new glass containers, according to the U.S. EPA.
According to the Glass Packaging Institute, use in fiberglass now accounts for the second highest use of post-consumer glass.
In Ohio, we know that significant amounts post -consumer glass is used by container manufacturers and fiberglass manufacturers, although we don't know the specific quantities used.
Other uses of post-consumer glass in the state include: as an abrasive in sand -blasting; filtering agent in septic and leach bed systems; and backfill for drainage around new housing.
Profile For Residential/Commercial Glass The Material Used and recycled for thousands of years Remains highly amenable to rec ycling Can be recycled into: bottles, fiberglass, asphalt, tile, decorative products Generation Households, restaurants, bars 500,000 to 700,000 tons in Ohio Approx.
88% packaging (bottle and jars) Predicted to decline slightly Collection Almost universally collected in curbside and drop-off programs Wide public acceptance as a recyclable material High rate of breakage in mixed collection systems is a problem Contamination is a problem Processing Challenging due to breakage (mixed loads) Heavy wear and tear on separation equipment Contamination sometimes prevent usage of material Optical sorting equipment has potential to separate and recover glass Transportation Costs High transport cost due to weight Limits break-even distance to end - users Rail transport option with large quantities Value of Material (recent) Cost of virgin materials create a "natural ceiling" on cullet value Flint - $25 to $38 Amber - $15 to $35 Green - $5 to $10 Mixed cullet - $ -20 to $4 (used to make fiberglass)
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
49
Ohio Glass Recycling Infrastructure
Key Glass Processors 1.
Cincinnati Cullet, Cincinnati 2.
Strategic Materials, Newark End Users 3.
4.
5.
Owens - Illinois, Zanesville ­ color separated for bottles Owens Corning Fiberglass, Newark ­ mixed cullet Theco, LLC., Jackson Center ­ mixed cullet for fiberglass
50
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Glass Task Force Recommendations Recommendation 1 : Continue and/or expand the cooperative marketing project The Task Force recommends a continuation of ODNR's role in organizing the cooperative marketing project for glass.
So far, at least three solid waste management districts have participated in the project, and several others have indicated an interest.
The Task Force recommends continued efforts to expand awareness among solid waste management districts and the continued monitoring of participation.
Recommendation 2 : Research feasibility of a cooperative project to bring optical sorting technology to Ohio One fundamental issue identified by the Task force is the low economic value of mixed cullet.
However, some processors outside of Ohio have purchased Optical Sorting Technology that provides automated color separation of mixed cullet, thus significantly increasing its value.
The Task Force recommends research by ODNR and OEPA to assess the value and feasibility of bringing this technology to Ohio.
Components of the research may include but are not be limited to the following: 1.
2.
Confirm the effectiveness of the technology and identify the associated costs; Identify the existing processors that may be interested in securing the technology (those that process a large amount of mixed cullet or service large commingled collection systems) and Solid Waste Management Districts (SWMDs) that could benefit from the use of the technology (tho se that produce a large amount of mixed cullet or rely heavily on commingled collection systems); Assess the potential value added to the SWMDs if the technology were available; Identify available grant funding and/or loans as start- up money for the project; and Explore a cooperative project between ODNR, other state agencies that have funding sources, SWMDs, and the private sector to bring the technology to Ohio.
3.
4.
5.
Recommendation 3 : Expand eligibility of ODNR grants The Task Force recommends that ODNR expand their grant eligibility requirements to accommodate regional market development initiatives and to allow easier access to the private sector.
Specifically, the Task Force recommends the following: 1.
2.
Make grants available for cross-district or multi -district market development projects; and Allow private sector enterprises to apply for market development grants directly to ODNR, if desired, without a SWMD as a co-applicant.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
51
Recommendation 4 : Recycling education for public sector entities One central issue identified by the Task Force is the notable difference between the value of mixed cullet versus color separated cullet.
The type of cullet produced is largely the result of the type of collection system utilized in a community.
The Task Force suspects that many public sector officials that have responsibility for development of recycling programs do not understand this and other issues associated with recycling systems and programs.
With this in mind, the Task Force recommends that IAWG develop a strategy to educate public sector officials on these recycling issues.
For example, it is the Task Force's understanding that the Ohio County Commissioners Association, the Ohio Municipal League, and possibly the Ohio Township Trustees Association all provide their members with resource materials associated with the various aspects of governing at these different levels.
Some of these resources address solid waste management.
The Task Force recommends that IAWG review these materials to see if they should be revised to more fully address some of the issues associated with recycling programs.
Recommendation 5 : Increase the usage of recycled glass in highway construction The Task Force spelled out 6 specific tasks for consideration in order to increase the use of recycled glass in highway construction throughout Ohio: 1.
The Task Force recommends that a database be assembled of current applications and case studies of the usage of recycled glass in road construction in Ohio and nationally: a. b. ODOT funds researc h and/or a review of other states' specifications and project results; ODOT provides detailed information concerning the specifications and reports of other states and other governmental entities on its website to encourage the use of recycled glass OR pro vides a link on the ODOT web site to ODNR's web site, where the reference material could be housed; ODNR funds research and/or review of all known Ohio uses of recycled glass in road construction and related uses; prepares fact sheets or other information for use as reference resources for interested contractors; and ODNR and ODOT also research new, high-end uses of recycled glass in road construction and collaborate to incorporate feasible information into reference database, which will be available on the designated web site and in the Tool Kit (mentioned in #4 below).
c. d.
2.
The Task Force recommends that a pilot project be conducted by ODOT in conjunction with a local county or municipal engineer's office to test the performance of crushed glass aggregate as a suitable roadbase material.
The purpose would be to determine if glass performs as well as traditional aggregates and to document the costs associated with using glass compared to traditional aggregates.
If the pilot is successful and the finds are favorable, it would be used as Ohio's premier case study.
An independent consultant should be employed to design and oversee implementation of the pilot and to review and document the findings.
The Task Force also recommends that this pilot qualify for ODNR Market Development Grant Funding if ODOT is unable to fund the project itself.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
52
a. b. c. d. e. f. 3.
Arrange a situation where county or municipal engineers work in advance with the appropriate recycling manager to stockpile and/or secure local glass to use; Provide a glass crushe r (loaned?) if local recycling manager needs it; Document cost and benefits - prior estimates and actuals; Videotape and photograph the entire project in professional formats; Obtain testimonial(s) [video and written] from engineers, city, recycling mana gers and residents using the roadway or component, if possible; and Arrange to have periodic evaluations of the test roadway by objective professionals, have them produce written reports and do testimonials.
Following a favorable outcome of the pilot study, the Task Force recommends that ODOT modify their specification for road base and other appropriate construction applications to allow the use of crushed glass aggregate and provide reference information for successful applications.
The Task Force als o recommends that the Ohio Recycling Market Development Plan acknowledge that ODOT is working on embankment specifications and hopes to put out a supplemental specification allowing the use of recovered glass in embankments sometime in the year 2000.
ODNR to assemble a "Tool Kit" including the specifications, case histories, video of Ohio's pilot project, resource/references and a list of contacts within Ohio who can provide information or assistance.
ODOT and ODNR to consider developing an incentive or recognition program for counties and/or municipalities who use glass in projects in the first year of two after this project is implemented.
ODOT and ODNR to present the Tool Kit and incentive/recognition program to county and municipal representa tives during regional or large local meetings.
4.
5.
6.
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
53
CONCLUSION Over the last two years, Ohio's recycling markets, in general, have stabilized both in the areas of supply and price.
This situation has resulted in the ability of processors and end market manufacturers to institute long - range investment and planning.
During the next two - year period, it will be the direction of the Interagency Workgroup to support, and where appropriate, implement the recommendations of the Glass, Plastic and Rubber/Tire Taskforce Groups.
Although recycling markets in general have improved since the writing of the last biennium report, it is clear that generators, recyclers/processors, and end markets will need to work in a more cooperative fashion if they are to master the fluctuations of the material markets.
Additionally, we must continue to recognize that markets are effected not only by actions at the local level, but that recycled materials are world - wide commodities, and therefore, their pricing trends are effected b y local, national and international supply and demand factors.
In reviewing the Material Taskforce recommendations contained in the Strategies section of this document, two major messages became recurring themes.
In order for Ohio to realize improved recycled material markets, there must be an effort to recruit and support new end product markets both in a technical and financial manner.
These markets should be sustainable and within reasonable transportation zones of those facilities that are processing t he recycled material.
Also, there must be an improved effort to establish and support a system of education and information sharing.
Governmental agencies and members of industry need to be aware of the roles and responsibilities as well as the potential benefits that can be realized when they coordinate their efforts to accomplish a commonly shared goal.
Agencies need to coordinate educational efforts so industry is aware of the financial and technical support available through state governmental programs .
This coordination also includes the responsibility of agencies to assist and not hinder the market development efforts of private industry.
Conversely, industry must be willing to share pertinent information that can be utilized by others in similar industrial fields.
These goals must be achieved for end product markets to progress in the State of Ohio.
Only through a strong partnership between government and private industry, can we realize the establishment of true sustainable recycling markets.
54
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
APPENDIX A ODNR Recycling Market Development Grant Success Stories To date, the Recycling Market Development Grant (RMDG) program has awarded $2.2 million for successful recycling market development projects throughout Ohio.
ODNR's most successful RMDG projects from the period of 1998 through 2000 are described below:
2000 Grant Projects Lucas County SWMD with Phoenix Technologies, LP $150,000 grant as part of a $1,100,000 project to install a high-tech commercial scale reactor and related equipme nt to purify PET plastic flake generated from curbside recycling bottle collections.
This equipment will allow Phoenix to produce over 4,000 tons per year of decontaminated PET resin for use in bottle manufacturing operations.
Phoenix recently received USFDA approval to use this recycled PET resin in direct food contact applications, the first such approval in the United States.
Grantee: John Minear, 419/213-6477 Business: Ms. Jean Bina. 616/887-0470 Portage County SWMD with Custom PlasTech, LTD $75,000 grant as part of a $300,000 project to purchase molds, fixtures, and a material handling system to enable Custom PlasTech to manufacture blow-molded plastic products that contain at least 10% post -consumer HDPE.
Eventually, the company will use at le ast 100 tons of recycled milk and detergent bottles per year to manufacture their specialty products, including a line of safety barricades.
Grantee: Charles Ramer, 330/678-8808 Business: Robert/Ron Zab, 440/564-5502 Solid Waste Authority of Central Ohio with Rumpke Recycling $150,000 grant as part of a $396,000 project designed to stabilize and enhance the central Ohio residential plastics recycling market.
Rumpke will purchase two automated bottle -sorting machines and install them at its Columbus facility to separate HDPE plastic from PET plastic in mixed bales.
Grantee: Irm Schubert, 614/871-8105 Business: Ben Pedigo, 513/242-4401 Wood County SWD with PETE Processors $37,400 grant as part of a $75,000 project to help reduce production costs for PETE Processors, an intermediate plastics processor, and improve economics for communities selling plastic bottles to PETE Processors.
They will install an automated bottle -sorting machine to separate HDPE plastic from PET plastic in mixed bales.
Grantee: Ken Rieman, 419/354-9296 Business: Kurt Humes, 419/353-7383
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
55
1999 Grant Projects Coshocton/Fairfield/Licking/Perry SWD with SBC Recycling Corporation $100,000 grant as part of a $444,000 project to purchase equipment to increase the volume and types of recyclables SBC processes.
SBC will collect and process an additional 430 tons per month of post -consumer carpet scrap and pad, metal containers, mixed plastics, and office paper.
Grantee: Carol Phillips, 740/349-6308 Business: Michael Hatfield, 740/893-3567 Defiance/Fulton/Paulding/Williams SWD with Haviland Drainage/Modern Plastics $100,000 grant as part of a $327,000 project to buy equipment to process 15,000 tons per year of mixed color post-consumer HDPE plastic feedstock to manufacture recycled-content drainpipe and tile.
Grantee: Timothy Houck, 419/782-5442 Business: Trent Stoller, 419/622-4611 North Central Ohio SWMD with Prodeva, Inc./THECO LLC $150,000 grant as part of a $400,000 project to install processing equipment to grind and clean mixed color post-consumer glass bottles.
The processed glass is ultimately sold to a company that uses it to produce recycled-content fiberglass insulation.
Grantee: Dennis Baker, 419/228-8278 Business: Steve Bunke, 800/999-3271
1998 Grant Projects Lucas County SWMD with Plastic Technologies, Inc. $139,835 grant as part of a $950,000 pilot project to demonstrate the commercial, technical, economic, and regulatory feasibility of a process to turn curbside generated post-cons umer PET into a resin that meets FDA guidelines for direct food contact plastic packaging.
Grantee: John Minear, 419/213-6477 Business: Jean Bina, 616/887-0470 Southeastern Ohio Joint SWMD with Mondo Polymer Technologies $95,000 grant as part of a $418,000 project to upgrade equipment that allowed Mondo to use increased quantities of post-consumer plastics as feedstock for its 100% recycled-content and federally approved highway guardrail blockouts.
This approval is the first for plastic blockouts in the USA.
Grantee: Robert Reiter, 740/732-5493 Business: Maggie Ellis, 740/376-9396 Stark/Tuscarawas/Wayne Joint SWMD with Rittman Paperboard/Caraustar $158,125 grant as part of a $433,000 project to purchase contamination separation equipment that enables Rittman to use post -consumer residential paper (plastic- lined bags, phone books, loose corrugated containers, etc.) to make 100% recycled -content paperboard and linerboard.
Grantee: Lenny Broome, 800/678-9839 Business: Jack Pogue, 330/927-7360
56
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
APPENDIX B Scrap Tire Loan/Grant Program Allotment to Date Grantee/Borrower Funds Encumbered Ashland County Solid Waste Management District Avon Local Board of Education Brecksville-Broadview Heights City School District Cloverleaf Local Schools Firelands Local School District Franklin Monroe Local School District NFM/Welding Engineers, Inc.
North Fork Local School District Northridge Athletic Boosters-Licking Co.
OSS County Joint Solid Waste District Smithfield Township Board of Trustees Summit/Akron Solid Waste Management Authority Tri-Valley Local School District
$7,930,770.63 $ 108,459.08 80,000.00 49,244.00 155,000.00 100,000.00 420.00 134,457.40 94,740.00 90,028.00 250,000.00 3,074.03 416,480.00 241,700.00 $1,723,602.51 $ 190,000.00 547,540.92 66,103.00 500,000.00 85,676.00 79,250.00 159,315.00 40,000.00 64,450.00 180,000.00 147,503.00 76,500.00 194,500.00 500,000.00 250,000.00 126,949.00 102,868.00 665,542.60 125,000.00 92,250.00 144,240.84 250,000.00 250,000.00 194,001.97 67,736.40 115,250.00 $5,214,676.73
Total Encumbered Grantee/Borrower - Funds Disbursed American Scrap Tire Recyclers, Inc.
Ashland County Solid Waste District Brecksville-Broadview Heights City School District C 
Franklin Monroe Local School District Jefferson Local Schools Johnstown-Monroe Local Schools Licking Valley Local School District Lima City School District Lucas County Solid Waste District National Feedscrew 
Smithfield Township Board of Trustees Tri-Valley Local School District Western Reserve Local School District Total Disbursed
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
57
APPENDIX C IAWG Technical and Financial Assistance Projects Project Plastic Lumber Plastic Lumber Hospital Collection Glass Processing Economic Impact Study RESEARCH Description ASTM standards for 100% recycled plastic HDPE and other composites Final round-robin testing for 6 ASTM standards for 100% recycled HDPE plastic lumber Greater Cleveland Recycling Initiative PVC collection systems in hospitals for use in products Mixed Glass Cullet with THECO, processing up to 1,900 tons per month Survey 
&
Project Pollution Prevention Loan RMD Grants Cooperative Marketing MACRO
Project Dates 1994 - ongoing 1994 - ongoing 1998 - ongoing 1999 - ongoing
Agency ODOD ODNR ODNR ODNR
Scrap Tire Loan/Grant
1994 - ongoing
ODOD
58
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
Project Asphalt Enhancer
Plastic Highway Products
Steel Roadway Materials Ohio Materials Exchange
Accounting/Purchasing
State Paper Contracts
State Printing Centers
Plastic Lumber Contract
Identification of Contracts
PROCUREMENT/EXCHANGE Description Use of recycled paper/cellulose fiber as an asphalt enhancer as an absorber for hot asphalt mix; 17 projects using approximately 700 tons of recycled paper fiber Highway specifications for recycled-content guardrail blockouts, flexible delineators and barrels; current purchases equal 15 tons of recycled plastic Recycled steel bridge beams, guardrails and concrete reinforcement items Reuse 
Project Dates 1993 - ongoing
Agency ODOT
1994 - ongoing
ODOT
1994 - ongoing 1997 - ongoing
ODOT OEPA ODNR ODOD ODNR
1997 - ongoing
1997 - ongoing
ODAS
1997 - ongoing
ODAS
1997 - 2000
ODAS
1997 - ongoing
ODNR
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
59
Project Aluminum Road Materials
Taxation Booklet
PROCUREMENT/EXCHANGE (continued) Description Project Dates Specifications allowed approx 158 1994 - ongoing tons of recycled aluminum to be used for signs, light poles, etc.; Testing of Kaiser large span recycled-content aluminum pipe and recycled grade sign sheeting anticipating 10-15% increase in use of recycled aluminum.
1999 State of Ohio Tax Instruction 1998 - ongoing booklet was printed on 44% recycled-content paper equal to 272 tons of recycled newsprint was used at a total cost of $140,800 REGULATION Description Supplemental enforcement projects allow organizations to undertake a pollution prevention project, such as recycling to settle a case Integrated Alternative Waste Management program provides an interim process to evaluate 
Agency ODOT
ODNR ODAS
Project Enforcement Projects
Project Dates 1997 - ongoing
Agency OEPA
IAWM Program
1997 - ongoing
OEPA
Scrap Tire Abatement
1997 - ongoing
OEPA
Project National Recycling Coalition
Project Dates 1993 - ongoing
Agency ODNR
Glass Lamp Recycling
1995 - ongoing
ODAS
60
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
APPENDIX D InterAgency WorkGroup Representatives Ohio Department of Natural Resources Donna Stusek, Administrator Division of Recycling and Litter Prevention 1889 Fountain Square Court, Bldg. F-2 Columbus, Ohio 43224 Phone: 614/265-6364 Fax: 614/262-9387 Email: donna.stusek@dnr.state.oh.us Ohio Department of Development Brad Biggs, Environmental Liaison Economic Development Division 77 South High Street P.O. Box 1001 Columbus, Ohio 43216-1001 Phone: 614/644-8201 Fax: 614/644-1789 Email: bbiggs@odod.state.oh.us Ohio Environmental Protection Agency Andrew Booker Division of Solid 
2000 Ohio Recycling Market Development Biennial Plan
61
For more information contact: Ohio Department of Natural Resources Division of Recycling 
